src/morphology/phonology.xfscript
!! ============================================================= !
!! The Central Siberian Yupik morphophonological/xfst rules file !
!! ============================================================= !

!! Note that this is a copy from Iñupiaq, it should be replaced with Central Siberian Yupik content.

! ======================== !
! Phonological definitions !
! ======================== !
echo
echo <<< Making the Ïnupiaq phonological component >>>
echo
echo <<< Defining the phonological inventory >>>

define stops     [ p | P | t | T | c h | k | q ] ;
define cont      [ v | V | s | S | s r | l | ł | ḷ | ľ | y | r | g | k h | ġ | q h | h ] ; ! ľ palatalized unvoiced lateral
define nas       [ m | M | n | N | ñ | ŋ ] ; 
define cns       [ stops | cont | nas ] ;
define vow       [ i | e | a | u ] ; ! NB not in accordance with Alaskan tradition: i = strong i whereas e represents the schwa
define dummy     [ %> | %^TRUNC | %^VCTRUNC | %^CVCTRUNC% | %^C | %^CLIT | %^FRIC | %^C | %^DEFRIC ] ;
define foreign   [ b | d | f | j | o | w | x | z ]
define segment   [ cns | vow | foreign | dummy ] ; ! dummy as segment??? XXX 
define flags     [ %@P%.IV%.ON%@ | %@P%.TV%.ON%@ | %@R%.IV%.ON%@ | %@R%.TV%.ON%@ | %@D%.IV%.ON%@ | %@D%.TV%.ON%@  ] ;



!********************
!Phonological rules *
!********************

echo
echo <<< Defining the phonological rules >>>

define SchwaDel1 [ e -> 0 || vow cns _ cns %^SCHWADEL ] ;
define SchwaDel2 [ cns -> 0 || [ i | a | u ] _ %^SCHWADEL ] ;
define DelSchwaDel [ %^SCHWADEL -> 0 ] ;
define PartAssKC [ k -> g || _ ( flags ) %> [ cont | nas ] ] ;
define PartAssQC [ q -> ġ || _ ( flags ) %> [ l | ł | nas ] ] ; !To be updated
define AssKG [ g -> k || k ( flags ) %>  _ ] ;
define AssTnas [ t -> n || _ ( flags ) %> nas ] ;
define AssTŁ [ t -> ł || _ ( flags ) %> ł ] ;
define AssTL [ t -> l || _ ( flags ) %> l ] ;
define PartAssTC [ t -> r || _ (flags ) %> [ v | g ] ] ;
define truncation [ stops -> 0 || _ ( flags ) %^TRUNC ( [ %^C | %^DEFRIC | flags ] ) %> ] ;
!iḷisaq@P.IV.ON@%^TRUNCllatu@R.IV.ON@%>ru      indpersonaffix ;

define TruncDelete [ %^TRUNC -> 0 ] ;
define fricativization [ q -> ġ || _ ( flags ) %> [ %^FRIC | nas ] ] ; !????? Not verified in corpus????
define AltKN [ k (->) ŋ || _ ( flags ) %> n ] ;
define AltML [ m (->) v || _ %> l ] ;
define AltNL [ n (->) l || _ %> l ] ;
define palatŁ [ ł -> ľ || i ( cns ) ( flags ) %> _ ] ; ! Not stem-internal palatalisation
define palatL [ l -> ḷ || i ( cns ) ( flags ) %> _ ] ; ! ditto
define palatN [ n -> ñ || i ( cns ) ( flags ) %> _ ] ; ! ditto
!define AltpalatT [ t (->) c h || i ( cns ) _ ( flags ) \segment ] ; 
define AltpalatT [ t (->) c h || i ( cns ) _ ( flags ) .#. ] ; 
define palatT [ t -> c h || i ( cns ) _ vow segment ] ; 
define Rgemination [ r -> r r || vow _ vow (cns) %^C %> ] ;
define Ggemination [ g -> g g || vow _ vow (cns) ( flags | dummy ) %^C %> ] ;
define Mgemination [ m -> m m || vow _ vow (cns) ( flags | dummy  ) %^C %> ] ;
define Ġgemination [ ġ -> ġ ġ || vow _ vow (cns) ( flags | dummy  ) %^C %> ] ;
define ĠQgemination [ ġ -> q q || vow _ vow (cns) ( flags ) %^DEFRIC %> ] ; !amaġu%^DEFRIC%>k -> amaqquk
define Gstop [ g -> k || [ t | k ] %> _ ] ;
define Qfusion1 [ g -> ġ || q ( flags ) ( flags ) %> ( flags ) _ ] ; 
define Qfusion2 [ q -> 0 || _ ( flags ) ( flags ) %> ( flags ) ġ ] ; 
define Kfusion [ k -> 0 || _ %^FRIC %> g ] ; 
define LongTassibilation [ t -> c h || i t ( flags ) %> _ ] ; ! MUST precede assibilation
define assibilation [ t -> s || i ( cns ) ( flags ) %> _ ( flags ) vow segment ] ;

define VeryLongTruncation [ cns vow (cns) -> 0 || _ %^CVCTRUNC ] ;


!**********************
!Simple rewrite rules *
!**********************

define SchwaReplace1 [ e -> a || _ ( dummy ) %> [ k | vow ] ] ;
define SchwaReplace2 [ e -> i ] ;
define StoCH [ s -> c h || t ( flags ) _ ] ;
define CleanCH [ c h ( flags ) c h -> t c h ] ; ! This is a stupid rule cleaning up the messy set of palatalization rules. Must be reorganized away


! ============= !
! Cleanup rules !
! ============= !

echo
echo <<< Defining the cleanup rules >>>

define CleanVeryLongTruncation [ %^CVCTRUNC -> 0 ] ;
define DummyDeletion [ dummy -> 0 ] ;
define GemDelete [ %^C -> 0 ] ;
define EblockDelete [ %^EBLOCK -> 0 ] ; !Works because %^EBLOCK is not defined as dummy

!************* 
!The cascade *
!*************

echo
echo <<< Compiling our rules... >>>

read regex [
     VeryLongTruncation
.o. SchwaDel1 ! [ e -> 0 || vow cns _ cns %^SCHWADEL ] ;
.o. SchwaDel2  ![ cns -> 0 || [ i | a | u ] %^SCHWADEL ] ;
.o. DelSchwaDel ![ %^SCHWADEL -> 0 ] ;
.o. truncation
.o. TruncDelete !
.o. CleanVeryLongTruncation
.o. Kfusion
.o. Mgemination
.o. Rgemination
.o. ĠQgemination  !maket@P.IV.ON@%>saaġe@R.IV.ON@%>ru%>k
.o. Ġgemination
.o. Ggemination
.o. GemDelete ! why this here?
.o. fricativization !atuġ@P.TV.ON@%>niaq@R.TV.ON@%>ge%>a
.o. SchwaReplace1 
.o. EblockDelete ! Why so early ???
.o. Qfusion1 ![ g -> ġ || q ( flags ) %> _ ] ;  
.o. Qfusion2
.o. PartAssQC 
.o. AltKN
.o. AssKG ![ g -> k || k ( flags ) %>  _ ] ;
.o. PartAssKC ![ k -> g || _ ( flags ) %> [ cont | nas ] ] ;
.o. LongTassibilation ![ t -> c h || i t ( flags ) %> _ ] ; ! MUST precede assibilation
.o. PartAssTC 
.o. Gstop
.o. AssTnas
.o. AssTL
.o. AssTŁ
.o. AltML
.o. AltNL
.o. assibilation !Is it really a very late rule??![ t -> s || i ( cns ) ( flags ) %> _ ( flags ) vow segment ]
! .o. DummyDeletion ! at the end!!
.o. palatL
.o. palatŁ
.o. palatN
.o. AltpalatT ![ t (->) c h || i ( cns ) _ ( flags ) \segment ] ; ! Works fine
.o. palatT ![ t -> c h || i ( cns ) _ vow segment ] ;
.o. StoCH ! [ s -> c h || t ( flags ) _ ] ;
.o. CleanCH
.o. SchwaReplace2
.o. DummyDeletion !!make@P.IV.ON@tiq@R.IV.ON@tuq
] ;

echo <<< Done, congratulations! >>>
